inc/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@
@U.ASPECT.PFV@
@U.ASPECT.PROG@
@U.ASPECT.POT@
@U.TAMA.%0@ @U.TAMA.%0s@ @U.TAMA.%0i@ 
@U.TAMA.si@ @U.TAMA.sis@ @U.TAMA.sii@
@U.TAMA.ni@ @U.TAMA.nis@ @U.TAMA.nii@
@U.TAMA.yi-y@ @U.TAMA.yis-y@
@U.TAMA.yi-a@ @U.TAMA.yii-a@
@U.TAMA.yi@ @U.TAMA.yii@ @U.TAMA.yis@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ 
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ 
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@
@D.PREFIX@ @R.PREFIX.INNER@ @R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.PREFIX.OUTER@ 


! Problem 1: gi-hopping

! gi- 3PL moves front of yi- 3SG.OBJ (3>3) and mi- 3SG.OBJ (1/2>3)
! (It also moves out in front of yi- and mi- with oblique/indirect objects at
!  the very far left edge of the verb -- basically, gi- will move as far left
!  as possible to sit in front of a yi- or mi-)
!
! (Solution: Use a combination of flags to handle these special-order cases --
!  treat them as precomposed strings that combine DO/IO and gi-)

! 3PL > 1S 
! sigiyísʔí "they saw me"
! si- 1SG.OBJ, gi- 3PL, yís TAMA, ʔí "saw"

! 3PL > 3S
! giyiyísʔí
! gi- 3PL, yi- 3SG.OBJ, yís TAMA, ʔí "saw"

! 3PL > 3PL
! gugiyísʔí
! gu- 3PL.OBJ (3PL>3PL), gi- 3PL, yís TAMA, ʔí "saw"


! Problem 2: Incorporated postpositions / oblique objects ("experiencer" cx's)
! sàgúdilo "I'm sick"
!   gúdilo ((HOW TO REPRESENT?))
! si-    à   gú-  di   lo
! 1SG.IO by  LEX  LEX  LEX

! IPFV ("am sick"):
! 1S sàgúdilo
! 2S nàgúdilo
! 3S màgúdilo
! 1P nahàgúdilo
! 2P nahàgúdilo
! 3P gimàgúdilo
! 4  gwàgúdilo   (u + a > wa)

! PFV ("was sick, have been sick"):
! 1S sàgúdiyílo
! 2S nàgúdiyílo
! 3S màgúdiyílo
! 1P nahàgúdiyílo
! 2P nahàgúdiyílo
! 3P gimàgúdiyílo
! 4  gwàgúdiyílo   (u + a > wa)



LEXICON Root

0-IPFV ;
ni-IPFV ; 

ni-PFV ;
si-PFV ;
yi-y-PFV ;
yi-a-PFV ;

yi-PROG ;

yi-POT ;


!
! 0-IPFV
!
LEXICON 0-IPFV

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@D.PREFIX@         0-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   0-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0s@@D.PREFIX@        0s-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0s@@R.PREFIX.INNER@  0s-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0s@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ 0s-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0s@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  0s-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0i@@D.PREFIX@        0i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0i@@R.PREFIX.INNER@  0i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0i@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ 0i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0i@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  0i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@iì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;	! CHECK
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;


LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@iì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;	! CHECK
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;


LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@i     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;

LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@i     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;

LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@i     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;


!
! ni-IPFV
!
LEXICON ni-IPFV

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@D.PREFIX@   ni-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.INNER@               ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@              ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@               ni-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@D.PREFIX@ nis-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@             nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             nis-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@D.PREFIX@ nii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@             nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@             nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@             nii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;


LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@iì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;


LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@as    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@i     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@i     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #; ! VOWEL LENGTH
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@i     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
